Utah statutes.
62A-11-307.1.   Collection directly from responsible parent.

(1)  The office may issue or modify an order under Section 62A-11-304.2 and collect under this part directly from a responsible parent if the procedural requirements of applicable law have been met and if public assistance is provided on behalf of that parent's dependent child.  The direct right to issue an order under this Subsection (1) is independent of and in addition to the right derived from that assigned under Section 35A-3-108.

(2)  An order issuing or modifying a support obligation under Subsection (1), issued while public assistance was being provided for a dependent child, remains in effect and may be enforced by the office under Section 62A-11-306.1 after provision of public assistance ceases.

(3) (a)  The office may issue or modify an administrative order, subject to the procedural requirements of applicable law, that requires that obligee to pay to the office assigned support that an obligee receives and retains in violation of Subsection 62A-11-307.2(4) and may reduce to judgment any unpaid balance due.

(b)  The office may collect the judgment debt in the same manner as it collects any judgment for past-due support owed by an obligor.

